Illinois, session 104th, HB1542.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 192/10)7    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 9reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing, 10refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 11fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 12painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 13from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 14bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 15waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other 16structure, project, development, real property, or 17improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether or not the 18performance of the work herein described involves the addition 19to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 20real property, or improvement herein described of any material 21or article of merchandise.22    "Construction industry" also includes moving construction 23related materials on the job site or to or from the job site,   HB1542- 2 -LRB104 03429 SPS 13452 b1snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection.2    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Labor.3    "Domestic work" and "domestic worker" have the same 4meanings as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' 5Bill of Rights Act, except that "domestic worker" also 6includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 7partnerships.8    "Employee" means an individual who (i) meets the 9definition of "employee" has the same application and meaning 10as that provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage 11Payment and Collection Act and (ii) works at least 195 hours 12for an employer over a period of at least 90 days. "Employee" 13also includes all domestic workers, and, for the purposes of 14this Act, domestic workers shall not be excluded as employees 15under the provisions of item (1), (2), or (3) of Section 2 of 16the Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act. "Employee" does 17not include: 18        (1) an employee as defined in the federal Railroad 19    Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.) or the 20    Railway Labor Act; 21        (2) a student enrolled in and regularly attending 22    classes in a college or university that is also the 23    student's employer, and who is employed on a temporary 24    basis at less than full time at the college or university, 25    but this exclusion applies only to work performed for that 26    college or university; or  HB1542- 3 -LRB104 03429 SPS 13452 b1        (3) a short-term employee who is employed by an 2    institution of higher education for less than 2 3    consecutive calendar quarters during a calendar year and 4    who does not have a reasonable expectation that they will 5    be rehired by the same employer of the same service in a 6    subsequent calendar year. 7    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 8provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 9Collection Act, except that for purposes of this Act, 10"employer" also means the State and units of local government, 11any political subdivision of the State or units of local 12government, or any State or local government agency. 13    "Employer" does not include school districts organized 14under the School Code or park districts organized under the 15Park District Code. 16    "Writing" or "written" means a printed or printable 17communication in physical or electronic format, including a 18communication that is transmitted through electronic mail, 19text message, or a computer system or is otherwise sent or 20stored electronically.21(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.)